Illinois, session 104th, HB5235.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Comprehensive Charitable Food System Coordination Act. 6    Section 5. Purpose. The purpose of this Act is to ensure 7that State-administered hunger relief programs and grantmaking 8activities strengthen the entire charitable food system by 9considering all key actors involved in food access, 10distribution, and coordination. 11    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:12    "Actor in the charitable food system" means a person or 13entity that is included in one or more of the following 14categories:15        (1) food providers, including food banks, food 16    pantries, community-based organizations, non-profit 17    organizations, schools, hospitals, mutual aid 18    organizations, retailers, and meal programs; 19        (2) food distributors, including last-mile delivery 20    organizations, and food wholesalers;21        (3) food producers, including farmers, agricultural 22    cooperatives, and community gardens;  HB5235- 2 -LRB104 17381 HLH 30806 b1        (4) facilitators,including logistics providers, 2    warehousers, storage facilities, aggregators, outreach 3    coordinators, and operational support agencies; and4        (5) operators of data systems used for the tracking, 5    measurement, and reporting of food and other edible 6    commodities.7    "Charitable food system" means the network of 8organizations, entities, and systems that procure, transport, 9distribute, or facilitate access to food or edible 10commodities, or the products of food or edible commodities, 11for individuals and families experiencing food insecurity. 12    Section 15. State grant coordination requirements.13    (a) In administering or appropriating State or 14State-managed federal grant funds for hunger relief, each 15State agency must:16        (1) consult and coordinate with, to the extent 17    practicable, all of the categories of actors in the 18    charitable food system listed in Section 10;19        (2) ensure that grant solicitations and funding 20    criteria reflect the interconnected roles of food 21    providers, distributors, producers, facilitators, and data 22    systems; and23        (3) consider proposals that strengthen coordination, 24    efficiency, resiliency, and equity across the charitable 25    food system.  HB5235- 3 -LRB104 17381 HLH 30806 b1    (b) State agencies are encouraged to establish advisory 2groups or working groups comprised of representatives from the 3categories of actors in the charitable food system listed in 4Section 10 to assist in developing funding priorities, 5performance metrics, and partnership guidelines. 6    Section 20. Reporting; evaluation. Each State agency 7administering hunger relief grant funds must submit an annual 8report to the appropriate State oversight entity describing:9        (1) how actors in the charitable food system were 10    engaged in grant planning, allocation, and evaluation;11        (2) measurable impacts on food access, food quality, 12    and community resilience; and13        (3) barriers or opportunities identified through 14    cross-sector collaboration. 15    Section 25. Authorization of appropriations. The General 16Assembly shall provide by law for appropriations in such sums 17as may be necessary to carry out this Act. 18    Section 900. The Department of Human Services Act is 19amended by changing Section 10-65 as follows: 20    (20 ILCS 1305/10-65)21    Sec. 10-65. Hunger Relief Fund; grants.22    (a) The Hunger Relief Fund is created as a special fund in   HB5235- 4 -LRB104 17381 HLH 30806 b1the State treasury. From appropriations to the Department from 2the Fund, the Department shall make grants to food banks and 3providers for the purpose of purchasing food and related 4supplies. In this Section, "food bank" means a public or 5charitable institution that maintains an established operation 6involving the provision of food or edible commodities, or the 7products of food or edible commodities, to food pantries, soup 8kitchens, hunger relief centers, or other food or feeding 9centers that, as an integral part of their normal activities, 10provide meals or food to feed needy persons on a regular basis. 11    (b) Moneys received for the purposes of this Section, 12including, without limitation, appropriations, gifts, 13donations, grants, and awards from any public or private 14entity must be deposited into the Fund. Any interest earned on 15moneys in the Fund must be deposited into the Fund.16    (c) As used in this Section, "provider" means a public or 17charitable organization that is unaffiliated with a food bank 18and maintains an operation involving the provision of food or 19edible commodities that, as an integral part of their normal 20activities, provide meals or food to feed needy persons on a 21regular basis. 22(Source: P.A. 96-604, eff. 8-24-09; 97-333, eff. 8-12-11.) 23    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 242026.